Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-546
School board, board of education, or other governing board; reimbursement for expenses.

Except as provided in section 79-1217, all members of a school board, board of education, or other governing board created pursuant to Chapter 79 shall not receive a per diem. Each such board may provide or reimburse members for expenses incurred while carrying out their duties. Mileage expenses shall be computed at the rate provided in section 81-1176. Sections 81-1174, 81-1175, and 81-1177 shall serve as guidelines for such boards when determining allowable expenses and reimbursement for such expenses.

Laws 1992, LB 1001, § 13;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,241;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 299;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 88.

Per diem for members of learning community coordinating council, see section 32-546.01.